Louisiana, session 2026, SB98.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:81.4(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§81.4. Prohibited sexual conduct between educator and student
* * *
B. As used in this Section:
(1) "Educator" means any administrator, coach, instructor, paraprofessional,
student aide, teacher, or teacher aide, school resource officer, or security guard at
any public or private school, assigned, employed, or working at the school or school
system where the victim is enrolled as a student on a full-time, part-time, or
temporary basis.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.